Washington statutes.
RCW 11.02.901

Application—1985 c 30—Application of 1984 c 149 as amended and reenacted in 1985.

(1) Nothing in chapter 8, 9, 10, 11, 23, 30, or 31, Laws of 1985 shall invalidate or nullify:

(a) Any instrument or property relationship that is executed and irrevocable as of the April 10, 1985; or

(b) Any action undertaken in a proceeding where the action was commenced before April 10, 1985, as long as the instrument, property relationship, or action complies with chapter 149, Laws of 1984.

(2) Except as specifically provided otherwise in chapter 149, Laws of 1984 as amended and reenacted in 1985, chapter 149, Laws of 1984 as amended and reenacted in 1985 shall apply to all instruments, property relationships, and proceedings existing on January 1, 1985.

[ 1985 c 30 s 139.]